Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 9. Miner Training.

§ 45.2-1165.
Training programs.

The Department may administer training programs for the purpose of (i) assisting with the provision of selected requirements of the federal mine safety law and (ii) preparing miners for examinations administered by the Department. The Director shall establish the curriculum and teaching materials for each training program, which shall be consistent with the requirements of the federal mine safety law where feasible.

The Department is authorized to charge each person attending a training program reasonable fees to cover the costs of administering the program. The Director may exempt certain persons from any required fees for refresher training programs based on the person’s employment status or any other criteria the Director deems appropriate. The Director shall not be required to allocate more of the Department’s resources to training programs than are appropriated or otherwise made available for such purpose or are collected from fees charged to attendees.

No miner, operator, or other person shall be required to participate in any training program established under this section. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent an operator or any other person from administering a state-approved training program.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:71; 1998, c. 695; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1166.
Mineral mining safety training.

The Director may implement a program of voluntary safety talks for mineral miners. Safety training may include topical training and talks conducted by inspectors or other Department personnel either on site or in a classroom provided for such purpose.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:72; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1167.
Mineral mining safety training programs.

Each operator shall have a plan containing the following programs: training for new miners, training for experienced miners who are newly employed, training for miners for new tasks, annual refresher training, and hazard training. For the purpose of this section, the definition of miner does not include a scientific worker; delivery worker; customer, including a commercial over-the-road truck driver; vendor; or visitor.

Such plan shall be available to the Director for review upon request.

History.

1998, c. 695, § 45.1-161.292:73; 2003, c. 401; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.